California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) Those minutes and other books and records shall be kept either in written form or in any other form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form or in any combination of the foregoing. When minutes and other books and records are kept in a form capable of being converted into clearly legible paper form, the clearly legible paper form into which those minutes and other books and records are converted shall be admissible in evidence, and accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as an original paper record of the same information would have been, provided that the paper form accurately portrays the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a member may inspect and copy the record of all the members’ names, addresses and voting rights, at reasonable times, upon five business days’ prior written demand upon the corporation for a purpose reasonably related to the member’s interest as a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the accounting books and records and minutes of proceedings of the members and the board and committees of the board shall be open to inspection upon the written demand on the corporation of any member at any reasonable time, for a purpose reasonably related to such person’s interests as a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

Every director shall have the right at any reasonable time to inspect and copy all books, records and documents of every kind and to inspect the physical properties of the corporation of which such person is a director for a purpose reasonably related to such person’s interests as a director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

9514.

(a) Upon refusal of a lawful demand for inspection under this chapter, the superior court of the proper county, or the county where the books or records in question are kept, may enforce the demand or right of inspection with just and proper conditions or may, for good cause shown, appoint one or more competent inspectors or independent accountants to audit the financial statements kept in this state and investigate the property and funds of any corporation and of any subsidiary corporation thereof, domestic or foreign, keeping records in this state and to report thereon in such manner as the court may direct.

(b) All officers and agents of the corporation shall produce to the inspectors or accountants so appointed all books and documents in their custody or power, under penalty of punishment for contempt of court.

(c) All expenses of the investigation or audit shall be defrayed by the applicant unless the court orders them to be paid or shared by the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [9610. - 9690.]



  ARTICLE 1. Distributions [9610. - 9610.]

9610.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5410) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations except for subdivision (b) of Section 5420.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation by a creditor, a director, or the authorized number of members. In any such action in addition to the remedy provided in subdivision (a) of Section 5420, the court may award punitive damages for the benefit of the corporation against any director, officer, member or other person who with intent to defraud the corporation caused, received or aided and abetted in the making of any distribution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Amendment of Articles [9620. - 9621.]

9620.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5810) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations except for Section 5813.5, the second sentence of Section 5817, and Section 5818.

(b) A corporation formed for a limited period may at any time subsequent to the expiration of the term of its corporate existence, extend the term of its existence by an amendment to its articles removing any provision limiting the term of its existence and providing for perpetual existence. If the filing of the certificate of amendment providing for perpetual existence would be prohibited if it were original articles by the provisions of Section 9122 the Secretary of State shall not file such certificate unless, by the same or a concurrently filed certificate of amendment, the articles of such corporation are amended to adopt a new available name. For the purpose of the adoption of any such amendment, persons who have been functioning as directors of such corporation shall be considered to have been validly elected even though their election may have occurred after the expiration of the original term of the corporate existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9621.

(a) A religious corporation may amend its articles to change its status to that of (1), a public benefit corporation, by complying with this section and the other sections of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5810) of Part 2 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9620) or (2), a mutual benefit corporation, business corporation, a social purpose corporation, or cooperative corporation by complying with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5810) of Part 2.

(b) Amended articles authorized by this section shall include the provisions which would have been required (other than the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the name of the initial agent for service of process if a statement has been
 filed pursuant to Section 6210, made applicable pursuant to Section 9660) and may in addition only include those provisions which would have been permitted, in original articles filed by the type of corporation (public benefit, mutual benefit, business, social purpose, or cooperative) into which the religious corporation is changing its status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 70.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale of Assets [9630. - 9634.]

9630.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge or other hypothecation of all or any part of the corporation’s property, real or personal, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any contract or obligation may be approved by the board. Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, no approval of the members (Section 5034) or of any other person or persons shall be necessary for such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9631.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 9142, a corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms are:

(1) Approved by the board; and

(2) Unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities, approved by the members (Section 5034) and by any other person or persons whose approval is required by the articles or bylaws either before or after approval by the board and before or after the transaction.

(b) Subject to any provision in the articles or bylaws, the board may, notwithstanding approval by the members (Section 5034) or such other person, abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the members, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 9142, such sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer or other disposition may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the corporation. The consideration may be money, property, or securities of any domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or foreign business corporation or any of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

9632.

Any deed or instrument conveying or otherwise transferring any assets of a corporation may have annexed to it the certificate of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, setting forth that the transaction has been validly approved by the board, that the notice, if any, required by Section 9633 has been given and (a) stating that the property described in such deed or instrument is less than substantially all of the assets of the corporation or that the transfer is in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, if such be the case, or (b) if such property constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of the corporation and the transfer is not in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, stating the fact of approval thereof by the members (Section 5034). Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts authorizing such conveyance or other transfer of the assets and conclusive evidence in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer for value who, without notice of any trust restriction applicable to the property or any failure to comply therewith, in good faith parted with value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9633.

A corporation must give written notice to the Attorney General 20 days before it sells, leases, conveys, exchanges, transfers or otherwise disposes of all or substantially all of its assets unless the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this section as to the proposed transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9634.

The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 5914) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 apply to religious corporations to the extent provided therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 26.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Mergers [9640. - 9640.]

9640.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 6010) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations except subdivision (a) of Section 6010 and Sections 6011 and 6012.

(b) A corporation may merge with any domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity (Section 5063.5). However, without the prior written consent of the Attorney General, a religious corporation may only merge with another religious corporation or with a public benefit corporation or a foreign nonprofit corporation or an unincorporated association, the
 governing documents of which provide that its assets are irrevocably dedicated to charitable, religious, or public purposes.

(c) The principal terms of the merger shall be approved by the members (Section 5034) of each class of each constituent corporation and by each other person or persons whose approval of an amendment of the articles is required by the articles or bylaws; and the approval by the members (Section 5034) or any other person or persons required by this section may be given before or after the approval by the board.

(d) The board of each corporation that desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The constituent corporations shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The amendments, subject to Sections 5810 and 5816, to the articles of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any. If any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation, the new name may be the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing corporation, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 9122.

(3) The amendments to the bylaws of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any.

(4) The name and place of incorporation of each constituent corporation and which of the constituent corporations is the surviving corporation.

(5) The manner, if any, of converting memberships of the constituent corporations into memberships of the surviving
 corporation.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 27.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bankruptcy Reorganizations and Arrangements [9650. - 9650.]

9650.

Any proceeding, initiated with respect to a corporation, under any applicable statute of the United States, as now existing or hereafter enacted, relating to reorganizations of corporations, shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 1 of Title 1, and for this purpose the reference in Chapter 14 to “shareholders” shall be deemed to be a reference to members and the reference to “this division” shall be deemed to be a reference to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 23.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Filings [9660. - 9660.]

9660.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 6210) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations except for Section 6216.

(b) The Attorney General may bring an action in the proper county to compel compliance with Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 6210) made applicable to religious corporations by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Service of Process [9670. - 9670.]

9670.

Service of process upon a corporation shall be governed by Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1700) of Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dissolution [9680. - 9680.5.]

9680.

(a) Chapters 16 (commencing with Section 6610) and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations except for Sections 6610, 6614, 6710, 6711 and 6716.

(b) (1) Any corporation may elect voluntarily to wind up and dissolve (A) by approval of a majority of all the members (Section 5033) or (B) by approval of the board and approval of the members (Section 5034).

(2) Any corporation which comes within one of the following descriptions may elect by approval of the board to wind up and dissolve:

(A) A corporation which has been
 the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy.

(B) A corporation which has disposed of all its assets and has not conducted any activity for a period of five years immediately preceding the adoption of the resolution electing to dissolve the corporation.

(C) A corporation which has no members.

(D) A corporation which is required to dissolve under provisions of its articles adopted pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9132.

(3) If a corporation comes within one of the descriptions in paragraph (2) and if the number of directors then in office is less than a quorum, it may elect to voluntarily wind up and dissolve by any of the following:

(A) The unanimous consent of the directors then in office.

(B) The affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office at a meeting held pursuant to waiver of notice by those directors complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9211.

(C) The vote of a sole remaining director.

(4) If a corporation elects to voluntarily wind up and dissolve pursuant to paragraph (3), references to the board in this chapter shall be deemed to be to a board consisting solely of those directors or that sole director and action by the board shall require at least the same consent or vote as would be required under paragraph (3) for an election to wind up and dissolve.

(c) If a corporation
 is in the process of voluntary winding up, the superior court of the proper county, upon the petition of (1) the corporation, or (2) the authorized number (Section 5036), or (3) the Attorney General, or (4) three or more creditors, and upon such notice to the corporation and members and creditors as the court may order, may take jurisdiction over the voluntary winding up proceeding if that appears necessary for the protection of the assets of the corporation. The court, if it assumes jurisdiction, may make such orders as to any and all matters concerning the winding up of the affairs of the corporation and the protection of its creditors and its assets as justice and equity may require. Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 6510) (except Sections 6510 and 6511) shall apply to those court proceedings.

(d) The powers and duties of the directors (or other persons appointed by the court pursuant to Section 6515) and officers after commencement of a
 dissolution proceeding include, but are not limited to, the following acts in the name and on behalf of the corporation:

(1) To elect officers and to employ agents and attorneys to liquidate or wind up its affairs.

(2) To continue the conduct of the affairs of the corporation insofar as necessary for the disposal or winding up thereof.

(3) To carry out contracts and collect, pay, compromise, and settle debts and claims for or against the corporation.

(4) To defend suits brought against the corporation.

(5) To sue, in the name of the corporation, for all sums due or owing to the corporation or to recover any of its property.

(6) To collect any amounts remaining unpaid on memberships or to recover unlawful distributions.

(7) Subject to the provisions of Section 9142, to sell at public or private sale, exchange, convey, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation in an amount deemed reasonable by the board without compliance with Section 9631, and to execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the corporation.

(8) In general, to make contracts and to do any and all things in the name of the corporation which may be proper or convenient for the purposes of winding up, settling and liquidating the affairs of the corporation.

(e) After complying with Section 6713:

(1) Except as provided in Section 6715, all of a
 corporation’s assets shall be disposed of on dissolution in conformity with its articles or bylaws subject to complying with the provisions of any trust under which such assets are held.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), the disposition required in subdivision (1) shall be made by decree of the superior court of the proper county. The decree shall be made upon petition therefor, upon 30 days’ notice to the Attorney General, by any person concerned in the dissolution.

(3) The disposition required in subdivision (1) may be made without the decree of the superior court, subject to the rights of persons concerned in the dissolution, if the Attorney General makes a written waiver of objections to the disposition.

(f) A vacancy on the board may be filled during a winding up proceeding in the manner provided in
 Section 9224.

(g) Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 6510) does not apply to religious corporations except to the extent its provisions apply under subdivision (d) of Section 6617, subdivision (c) of Section 6719, or subdivision (c) or (d) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 35.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9680.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, when a corporation has not issued any memberships, a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators, may sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating the following:

(1) That the certificate of dissolution is being filed within 24 months from the date the articles of incorporation were filed.

(2) That the corporation does not have any debts or other liabilities, except as provided in paragraph (3) and subdivision (d).

(3) That the tax liability will be satisfied on a taxes-paid basis or that a person or corporation or other business entity assumes the tax liability, if any, of the dissolving corporation and is responsible for additional corporate taxes, if any, that are assessed and that become due after the date of the assumption of the tax liability.

(4) That a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) That the corporation was created in error.

(6) That the known assets of the corporation remaining after payment of, or adequately providing for, known debts and liabilities have been distributed as
 required by law or that the corporation acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(7) That a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators authorized the dissolution and elected to dissolve the corporation.

(8) That the corporation has not issued any memberships, and if the corporation has received payments for memberships, those payments have been returned to those making the payments.

(9) That the corporation is dissolved.

(b) A certificate of dissolution signed and verified pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(c) Upon filing a certificate of dissolution pursuant to subdivision (b), a corporation shall be dissolved and its powers, rights, and privileges shall cease.

(d) Notwithstanding the dissolution of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to this section, its liability to creditors, if any, is not discharged. The liability of the directors of, or other persons related to, the dissolved corporation is not discharged. The dissolution of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to this section shall not diminish or adversely affect the ability of the Attorney General to enforce liabilities as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 363, Sec. 5.   (AB 557)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Crimes and Penalties [9690. - 9690.]

9690.

The provisions of Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 6810) of Part 2 apply to religious corporations. In so providing, the Legislature encourages the criminal courts of this state in sentencing persons convicted of fraudulent activities in the guise of religious activity to exercise their authority to impose restitution as a means of compensating the victims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1324.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 5. TRANSITION PROVISIONS [9910. - 9928.]

9910.

As used in Sections 9910 to 9927 of this part:

(a) “New public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporation law” means Part 1 (commencing with Section 5002), Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) and Part 5 (commencing with Section 9910), of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code enacted by the California Legislature during the 1977–1978 Regular Session and, except as required by Section 9912, operative January 1, 1980.

(b) “New public benefit corporation law” means Part 2 of the new public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporation law.

(c) “New mutual benefit corporation law” means Part 3 of the new public benefit, mutual benefit, and religious corporation law.

(d) “New religious corporation law” means Part 4 of the new public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporation law.

(e) “Prior nonprofit law” means Part 1, Division 2 (commencing with Section 9000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code in effect on December 31, 1979.

(f) “Subject corporation” means any corporation described in paragraphs (3) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 5003 and subject to the prior nonprofit law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9911.

(a) The new public benefit corporation law applies to all corporations which are incorporated on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 2 of this division or which are expressly governed by Part 2 pursuant to a particular provision of this division, Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or other specific statutory provision.

(b) The new mutual benefit corporation law applies to all corporations which are incorporated on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 3 of this division or which are expressly governed by Part 3 pursuant to a particular provision of this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or other specific statutory provision.

(c) The new religious corporation law applies to all corporations which are incorporated on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 4 of this division or which are expressly governed by Part 4 pursuant to a particular provision of this division, Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or other specific statutory provision.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) through (c), if articles of incorporation intended to and in fact meeting the requirements of the prior nonprofit law have been initially received by the Secretary of State prior to January 1, 1980, and the matter is still pending on that date, then the entity may be incorporated pursuant to the prior nonprofit law if its articles are filed prior to May 1, 1980.

(e) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, (i) the new public benefit corporation law applies to all subject corporations referred to in Section 5060 and to all actions taken by the directors, officers or members of such corporation on or after January 1, 1980; (ii) the new mutual benefit corporation law applies to all subject corporations referred to in Section 5059 and to all actions taken by the directors, officers or members of such corporations on or after January 1, 1980; and (iii) the new religious corporation law applies to all subject corporations referred to in Section 5061 and to all actions taken by the directors, officers or members of such corporations on or after January 1, 1980. 

(f) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, all of the sections of the new public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporation law governing acts, contracts or other transactions by a corporation or its directors, officers or members, apply only to acts, contracts, or transactions occurring on or after January 1, 1980; and the prior nonprofit law governs acts, contracts or transactions occurring before January 1, 1980.

(g) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, any vote or consent by the directors or members of a corporation prior to January 1, 1980, in accordance with the prior nonprofit law shall be effective in accordance with that law; and if any certificate or document is required to be filed in any public office of this state relating to such vote or consent, it may be filed on or after January 1, 1980, in accordance with the prior nonprofit law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9912.

(a) Each corporation which is subject (pursuant to the terms of the prior nonprofit law or some other specific statutory provision) to the prior nonprofit law shall, on and after January 1, 1980, be subject to the new public benefit corporation law, the new mutual benefit corporation law, or the new religious corporation law based on the following:

(1) Any corporation of a type designated by statute as being subject to the new public benefit corporation law, the new mutual benefit corporation law, or the new religious corporation law, shall be subject to such law.

(2) Any corporation organized primarily or exclusively for religious purposes shall be subject to the new religious corporation law.

(3) Any corporation which does not come within paragraphs 1 or 2 of this subdivision but which has received an exemption under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be subject to the new public benefit corporation law.

(4) Any corporation which does not come within paragraphs 1, 2, or 3 of this subdivision and all of the assets of which are irrevocably dedicated to charitable or public purposes and which according to its articles or bylaws must upon dissolution distribute its assets to a person or persons carrying on a similar purpose or purposes shall be subject to the new public benefit corporation law.

(5) Any corporation which does not come within paragraphs 1, 2, 3 or 4 of this subdivision and which permits distribution of assets to its members upon dissolution shall be subject to the new mutual benefit corporation law.

(6) Any corporation not otherwise described in this subdivision shall be subject to the new mutual benefit corporation law.

(b) Prior to January 1, 1980, the Secretary of State’s office shall send a nonbinding, advisory notice to each corporation covered by subdivision (a) indicating the type of corporation it is, based on the rules set forth in subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), assets held by a mutual benefit corporation in charitable trust shall be administered in compliance with the provisions of the trust and in accordance with any standards applicable pursuant to Section 7238.

(d) A corporation may petition the superior court of the proper county to determine its status as a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation in accordance with subdivision (a). Notice of the proceeding shall be given as the court may direct. Any member may intervene. Notice of the proceeding shall be served on the Attorney General who may intervene. A certified copy of any final judgment in any such proceeding shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(e) The Secretary of State may, in carrying out any obligation arising under this article, require any information necessary on existing corporations from the Franchise Tax Board or other state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9913.

(a) The provisions of Sections 5130, 5131 and 5132 of the new Public Benefit Corporation Law relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to subject corporations designated as public benefit corporations unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the new law not otherwise applicable to it under this part.

(b) The provisions of Sections 7130, 7131, and 7132 of the new Mutual Benefit Corporation Law relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to subject corporations governed by the Mutual Benefit Corporation Law unless
 and until an amendment of the articles of incorporation is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the new law not otherwise applicable to it under this part.

(c) The provisions of Sections 9130, 9131, and 9132 of the new Religious Corporation Law relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to subject corporations governed by the Religious Corporation Law unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the new law not otherwise applicable to it under this part.

(d) The amendment described in subdivision (a) may be adopted by the board alone, except that if such amendment makes any change in the articles other than conforming the
 statement of purposes of the public benefit corporation to Section 5130 and the deletion of any references to the location of principal office and deleting any statement regarding the number of directors or conforming any such statement to Section 5151 (subject to Section 9915), it shall also be approved by the members (Section 5034) if such approval is otherwise required for the changes made.

(e) The amendment described in subdivision (b) may be adopted by the board alone, except that if such amendment makes any change in the articles other than conforming the statement of purposes of the mutual benefit corporation to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 7130 and the deletion of any references to the location of principal office and deleting any statement regarding the number of directors or conforming any such statement to Section
 7151 (subject to Section 9915), it shall also be approved by the members (Section 5034) if such approval is otherwise required for the changes made.

(f) The amendment described in subdivision (c) may be adopted by the board alone, except that if such amendment makes any change in the articles other than conforming the statement of purposes of the religious corporation to Section 9130 and the deletion of any references to the location of principal office and deleting any statement regarding the number of directors or conforming any such statement to Section 9151 (subject to Section 9915), it shall also be approved by the members (Section 5034) if such approval is otherwise required for the changes made.

(g) The amendment shall not contain the initial street address or initial
 mailing address of the corporation or name the corporation’s initial agent for service of process if a statement required by Section 6210, 8210, or 6210 (made applicable by Section 9660), as the case may be, has been filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 26.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9914.

Section 5140 of the new public benefit corporation law applies to subject corporations governed by the public benefit corporation law, and Section 7140 of the new mutual benefit corporation law applies to subject corporations governed by the mutual benefit corporation law and Section 9140 of the new religious corporation law applies to subject corporations governed by the religious corporation law; but any statement in the articles of such corporations prior to an amendment thereof pursuant to Section 9913, relating to the powers of the corporation shall not be construed as a limitation unless it is expressly stated as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9915.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 5151 of the new public benefit corporation law does not apply to subject corporations governed by the public benefit corporation law, subdivision (a) of Section 7151 of the new mutual benefit corporation law does not apply to subject corporations governed by the mutual benefit corporation law, and subdivision (a) of Section 9151 of the new religious corporation law does not apply to subject corporations governed by the religious corporation law, but those corporations shall continue to be governed by the prior nonprofit law unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed pursuant to Section 9913. If an amendment makes any change in the number of directors or the maximum or minimum number of directors or makes change from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa, it shall also be approved by the members (Section 5034). 

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the new public benefit corporation law, the new mutual benefit corporation law, or the new religious corporation law, as appropriate, rather than the provisions of the prior nonprofit law apply with the respect to determining the limits on the number of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

9916.

Subdivision (a) of Section 5213 of the new public benefit corporation law applies to subject corporations governed by the public benefit corporation law, subdivision (a) of Section 7213 of the new mutual benefit corporation law apply to subject corporations governed by the mutual benefit corporation law, and subdivision (a) of Section 9213 of the new religious corporation law applies to subject corporations governed by the religious corporation law; but the “treasurer” of those corporations shall be deemed to be the “chief financial officer,” unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 36.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9916.5.

Subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 5220 apply to subject corporations governed by the nonprofit public benefit corporation law and subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 7220 apply to subject corporations governed by the nonprofit mutual benefit corporation law, provided that:

(a) If a director on January 1, 1980, is serving a term in excess of three years in duration, the director may continue to serve until December 31, 1982, or until the expiration of the term whichever is earlier.

(b) If, on January 1, 1980, more than one-third of the directors of a corporation hold office by virtue of designation or selection, they may continue to do so until December 31, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

9917.

Section 5238 governs any proposed indemnification by a public benefit corporation, Section 7237 governs any proposed indemnification by a mutual benefit corporation, and Section 9246 governs any proposed indemnification by a religious corporation, after January 1, 1980, whether the events upon which the indemnification is based occurred before or after January 1, 1980. Any statement relating to indemnification contained in the articles or bylaws of a subject corporation shall not be construed as limiting the indemnification permitted by Section 5238, Section 7237, or Section 9246 unless it is expressly stated as so intended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

9918.

Section 7313 of the new mutual benefit corporation law relating to membership certificates applies to the membership certificates of a subject corporation if the certificates are issued on or after January 1, 1980, and the prior nonprofit law shall continue to govern certificates representing memberships issued prior to January 1, 1980, unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed pursuant to Section 9913.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9920.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5510) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5610) of the new Public Benefit Corporation Law apply to any meeting of members of a public benefit corporation, the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7510) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7610) of the new Mutual Benefit Corporation Law apply to any meeting of members of a mutual benefit corporation, and the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9410) of the new Religious Corporation Law apply to any meeting of members of a religious corporation, held on or after January 1, 1980, and to any action by such members pursuant to a written ballot, which becomes effective on or after January 1, 1980, and to any vote cast at such a meeting or ballot, given for such action (whether or not a proxy or ballot was executed by the member prior to January 1, 1980).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a):

(1) The prior nonprofit law shall apply to any such meeting of members and to any vote cast at such a meeting if such meeting was initially called for a date prior to January 1, 1980, and notice thereof was given to members entitled to vote thereat; and
